Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
STATE SYSTEM OF COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

23-60-201. State system of community and technical colleges established - local district colleges - role and mission.

There is established a state system of community and technical colleges that is under the management and jurisdiction of the state board for community colleges and occupational education. The mission of the community colleges is to serve Colorado residents who reside in their service areas by offering a broad range of general, personal, career, and technical education programs, bachelor of applied science degree programs approved pursuant to section 23-60-211 (4), and bachelor of science in nursing completion programs that result in the awarding of a bachelor of science in nursing degree to successful candidates pursuant to section 23-60-211 (5). Except as provided in section 23-60-211, each college must be a two-year college. Each community college may offer two-year degree programs with or without academic designation, and, upon approval of the board pursuant to section 23-60-211, may offer technical, career, and workforce development bachelor of applied science degree programs. A community college shall not impose admission requirements upon any student. Admission to a community college does not guarantee enrollment in a specific program that has prerequisites. The objects of the community and technical colleges are to provide educational programs to fill the occupational needs of youth and adults in career and technical fields, two-year transfer educational programs to qualify students for admission to the junior year at other colleges and universities, developmental education courses, workforce development, and a broad range of personal and career education for adults, and technical, career, and workforce development bachelor of applied science degree programs established pursuant to section 23-60-211, that address the needs of the community within each community college service area.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 439, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-10.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 765, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2596, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-088), ch. 154, p. 530, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-004), ch. 13, p. 119, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1086), ch. 70, p. 630, § 2, effective March 24.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1206), ch. 133, p. 606, § 20, effective April 25.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2506, § 8, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-004, see section 1 of chapter 13, Session Laws of Colorado 2014. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1086, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1206, see section 1 of chapter 133, Session Laws of Colorado 2019. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-60-202. Duties of board with respect to state system.

With respect to the community and technical colleges within the state system, the board has the authority, responsibility, rights, privileges, powers, and duties customarily exercised by the governing boards of institutions of higher education, including the following:

To recommend to the Colorado commission on higher education and the general assembly the location and priorities for establishment of new community and technical colleges;

To construct, lease, or otherwise provide facilities needed for the community and technical colleges as authorized by the general assembly; to issue in the name of the board revenue bonds and other revenue obligations in the manner, for the purposes, and subject to the provisions provided by law for state educational institutions under article 5 of this title or for local college districts; and to refund in the name of the board revenue bonds and other revenue obligations transferred to the board or incurred by the board as provided in this article, such refunding to be undertaken pursuant to article 54 of title 11, C.R.S.;

To fix the tuition and fees to be charged in the community and technical colleges. The board shall fix tuition in accordance with the level of cash fund appropriations set by the general assembly for such institutions pursuant to section 23-1-104 (1)(b)(I).
(c) (I) (A) To fix the tuition and fees to be charged in the community and technical colleges. The board shall fix tuition in accordance with the level of cash fund appropriations set by the general assembly for such institutions pursuant to section 23-1-104 (1)(b)(I).

Repealed.

To the extent space is available, the board may allow persons licensed pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22 to take, without charge, at community and technical colleges, courses identified by the department of public safety pursuant to section 24-33.5-1606.5 (4), as related to the national incident management system developed by the federal emergency management agency.

To appoint the chief administrative officer of each community and technical college;

To recommend and review proposals for the establishment of curriculums and for major changes in curriculums, subject only to the review function of the Colorado commission on higher education relating to formal academic programs;

To define the requirements of appropriate degrees and certificates and to authorize the award thereof in the community and technical colleges, subject only to the review function of the Colorado commission on higher education relating to formal academic programs;

To review and approve the degree programs described in section 23-60-211, subject only to the review function of the Colorado commission on higher education relating to formal academic programs;

To develop a plan with the governing boards of baccalaureate degree-granting universities and colleges of the state which will assure maximum freedom of transfer of students between local district colleges and community and technical colleges under the direct control of the board and such universities and colleges;

To receive, review, and transmit with recommendations to the Colorado commission on higher education and the general assembly both operating and capital budget requests of the community and technical colleges;

To plan, in cooperation with other state agencies, the allocation of federal funds for instructional programs and student services, including funds for vocational and technical education and retraining;

To determine policies pertaining to the community and technical colleges, subject only to the functions and powers assigned by law to the Colorado commission on higher education relating to formal academic programs;

To control the direction of funds and appropriations to the colleges in the system;

To receive, demand, and hold for the uses and purposes of the colleges in the system such moneys, lands, or other properties as may be donated, devised, leased, or conveyed and to apply the same in such manner as will serve best the objects and interests of the colleges in the system;

To develop and implement, in coordination with four-year institutions and under the direction of the Colorado commission on higher education, a core transfer program for students wishing to obtain a baccalaureate degree after transferring out of the state system to a four-year institution, which program shall be implemented within the state system by September 15, 1987.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 439, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-11.

L. 70:

p. 358, § 14.

L. 85:

(1)(d) and (1)(i) amended and (1)(k) and (1)(l) added, p. 765, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(m) added, p. 840, § 3, effective April 14.

L. 93:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1520, § 30, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(n) added, p. 338, § 4, effective April 2.

L. 2008:

(1)(c) amended, p. 119, § 7, effective March 19; (1)(c) amended, p. 805, § 6, effective May 14.

L. 2009:

(1)(n) repealed, (HB 09-1319), ch. 286, p. 1322, § 13, effective May 21.

L. 2010:

(1)(c)(I) amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1845, § 18, effective June 9; (1)(f.5) added, (SB 10-088), ch. 154, p. 530, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

(1)(c)(II) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1050, § 42, effective June 30.

23-60-202.5. Powers of board with respect to the higher education and advanced technology center at Lowry.

The board is authorized to lease classroom and administrative facilities located at the higher education and advanced technology center at Lowry to colleges within the state system of community and technical colleges and to public and private institutions of higher education that are not included in the system.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 582, § 1, effective May 22.

23-60-202.7. Powers of board with respect to concurrent enrollment - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board of cooperative services" means a board of cooperative services created pursuant to article 5 of title 22 that operates a public school.

"Charter school" means a district charter school authorized by a school district board of education pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22 and an institute charter school authorized by the state charter school institute board pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22.

"Concurrent enrollment" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-35-103.

"Local education provider" means a school district, a charter school, a board of cooperative services, and the school for the deaf and the blind.

"School district" means a school district organized and existing pursuant to article 30 of title 22.

"School for the deaf and the blind" means the Colorado school for the deaf and the blind described in section 22-80-102.

The board shall ensure that the community college system provides leadership, system-level service, and management and coordination of efforts within the system to streamline policies, eliminate administrative barriers, and implement efforts to maximize participation in concurrent enrollment across the community college system. Coordination of efforts includes facilitating the sharing of best practices among institutions, driving innovation, and building capacity for offering concurrent enrollment to more students across the state with a focus on student academic success.

The community college system may receive funding for the services described in this section through a limited purpose fee-for-service contract as provided in section 23-18-308.

Beginning in the 2021-22 fiscal year, the community college system shall collaborate with the local education providers throughout the state to develop and disseminate informational materials for the parents of students enrolled in grades six through eight. The community college system shall design the materials to explain the benefits of participating in concurrent enrollment during grades nine through twelve and, for all types of institutions of higher education as defined in section 22-35-103, the types of courses available through concurrent enrollment and the general requirements and process for enrolling in concurrent enrollment courses. At a minimum, the materials must refer to the website developed by the department of education pursuant to section 22-35-113, and the materials provided for each local education provider must include the name of and contact information for the person who oversees concurrent enrollment in that local education provider. A local education provider may provide directory information, as defined in and in accordance with federal law, to the community college system to use only in disseminating information pursuant to this subsection (4).

The community college system, in collaboration with the local education providers, shall begin disseminating the concurrent enrollment information materials developed pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section beginning in the fall of the 2021-22 academic year. At a minimum, the community college system shall provide materials to parents of students enrolled in grades six through eight through digital means at least once during the school year and once during the summer months. The community college system may also provide the information contained in the materials through public service announcements, paid placements on social media platforms, or other mass communication means, subject to available appropriations.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (4) to the contrary, the community college system may begin developing and disseminating informational materials as provided in subsections (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this section during the 2020-21 fiscal year if the community college system deems it feasible to do so within existing resources.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-176), ch. 244, p. 2389, § 9, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (4) added, (SB 20-095), ch. 180, p. 818, § 1, effective June 29.

23-60-203. Duties of board with respect to local district colleges.

With respect to local district colleges operating under the provisions of article 71 of this title, the board shall:

Exercise all powers and perform all duties vested prior to July 1, 1967, in the state board of education or in the commissioner of education with respect to local district colleges;

Review and make recommendations concerning requests by any local district college for appropriations for capital construction before such requests are submitted to the Colorado commission on higher education and the general assembly; and

Provide such local district colleges with such technical assistance as they may request.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 440, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-12.

L. 73:

p. 1337, § 1.

L. 75:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, p. 787, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 78:

(1)(a) amended, p. 265, § 60, effective May 23.

23-60-204. Financing.

Except as provided in this article, the construction, operation, and maintenance of the community and technical colleges within the state system shall be financed by the state in the same manner as are all other state institutions of higher education.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 440, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-13.

23-60-205. Community and technical colleges.

The state system of community and technical colleges includes: Arapahoe community college, Colorado Northwestern community college, the community college of Aurora, the community college of Denver, Front Range community college, Lamar community college, Morgan community college, Northeastern junior college, Otero college, Pikes Peak state college, Pueblo community college, Red Rocks community college, Trinidad state college, and Colorado community college and occupational education system college. The state board for community colleges and occupational education governs the state system of community and technical colleges.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 440, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-14.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 766, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 56, § 6, effective March 20.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2596, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-008), ch. 155, p. 881, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1280), ch. 122, p. 564, § 1, effective April 22.

23-60-206. College advisory council.

The board shall establish a procedure for receiving nominations for appointments to the college advisory council and shall appoint a seven-member college advisory council for each community and technical college under its governance, composed of residents from the area in which the community and technical college is located and serves, which council shall meet at least quarterly with the chief administrative officer of the college. The board of trustees of any local district college shall be designated as the first college advisory council when such local district college joins the state system, and members thereof shall serve for the duration of their terms. Upon expiration of such terms, new appointees shall be so designated that the college advisory council will at all subsequent times include at least two members familiar with occupational education needs. Of members first appointed, three members shall be appointed for four years and two members for two years. Thereafter, terms of members appointed to the college advisory council shall be for four years. The members of a college advisory council in office on April 14, 1986, shall remain in office for the remainder of their respective terms, and, thereafter, may be reappointed by the board. Effective July 1, 1986, the board shall appoint two members for each college advisory council, one member to serve for a term of two years and one member to serve for a term of four years. Members of the college advisory council shall receive twenty dollars per day for meetings attended and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of official business.

(1.5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, if the plan for Colorado Northwestern community college to join the state system of community and technical colleges is approved and moneys are appropriated therefor as provided in section 23-71-207 and if the Moffat county affiliated junior college district voters approve the ballot measure set forth in section 23-71-207 (1)(b)(II), the initial advisory council for Colorado Northwestern community college shall consist of three members of the Rangely junior college district board of trustees, three members of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district board of control, and one member at large to be appointed by the state board for community colleges and occupational education from the Colorado Northwestern community college designated service area. If the Moffat county affiliated junior college district voters do not approve the ballot measure set forth in section 23-71-207 (1)(b)(II), the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply.

The board shall officially recognize within its policies the manner in which it shall receive advice from local councils concerning local oversight of each of the state system community colleges and shall include consideration of advice in the areas of tuition and fees; operating and capital budgets; allocation of moneys; money, land, and other property; instructional programs; degrees and certificates; appointment of chief administrative officers of campuses; personnel policies; and admissions and academic standards. A report containing such information shall be prepared and submitted to the Colorado commission on higher education no later than January 15, 1987.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 441, § 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-15.

L. 85:

(2) amended, p. 770, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended and (2) R&RE, pp. 840, 841, §§ 4, 5, effective April 14; (1) amended, p. 845, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1.5) added, p. 902, § 2, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) in House Bill 86-1133 and House Bill 86-1237 were harmonized.

23-60-207. College service areas.

Each college in the state system of community and technical colleges shall operate within a service area assigned by the Colorado commission on higher education.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 766, § 18, effective July 1.

23-60-208. Eminent domain.

The board has the power to take and hold, by gift, devise, purchase, or lease or through the exercise of the power of eminent domain pursuant to law, so much land as may become necessary for the location and construction of such buildings, structures, and other facilities as may be required for the uses and purposes of the colleges in the state system.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 766, § 18, effective July 1.

23-60-209. Programs and services.

The board shall ensure that no unnecessary duplication of programs or services exists between the community colleges in the metropolitan Denver area and the vocational schools operating in the same geographic area.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 766, § 18, effective July 1.

23-60-210. Transfer of records and equipment - creation of new colleges.

At the board's discretion, the board may transfer books, records, equipment, property, personnel, accounts, and liabilities of the community college of Denver or any other entity to Red Rocks community college, Front Range community college, and the reconstituted community college of Denver in order to effect the creation of such colleges.

All employees, exempt and classified, transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall retain all rights to state personnel system and retirement benefits under the laws of this state, and their services shall be deemed to have been continuous. All such transfers and any abolishment of positions in the state personnel system shall be made and processed in accordance with state personnel system laws and rules and regulations.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 766, § 18, effective July 1.

23-60-211. Degrees.

Before a community college offers a two-year degree program with academic designation, as authorized by section 23-60-201, the community college shall determine the program designation for the degree. A two-year degree program with academic designation shall only be for a degree program that has a valid student transfer agreement pursuant to section 23-1-108 (7); except that a community college may offer a two-year degree program with academic designation in dental hygiene without a valid student transfer agreement. The community college shall then submit the degree program designation to the board for its review and approval. The community college may offer the degree program only after it has been approved by the board and by the Colorado commission on higher education. The community college shall exclusively use the degree program designation name in official publications, course catalogs, diplomas, and official transcripts.

Successful completion of an associate of arts or associate of science degree with academic designation does not guarantee the degree holder admission to a four-year state-supported institution of higher education; nor does it guarantee the degree holder automatic transfer of credits unless the degree holder has fulfilled the requirements of an existing statewide transfer agreement.

Pursuant to section 23-60-213, Red Rocks community college may offer a graduate program in physician assistant studies.

Subject to the requirements of section 23-1-107, a community college that is part of the state system of community and technical colleges may, with board approval, offer a bachelor of applied science degree. A community college may request authority to offer more than one bachelor of applied science degree program. In considering whether to approve a request by a community college to offer a bachelor of applied science degree, the board shall consider student and workforce demand, cost effectiveness for the students, the community college system, and the state, and accreditation and licensing requirements.

The board shall notify the Colorado commission on higher education of each bachelor of applied science degree program that the board approves pursuant to this subsection (4).

Subject to the requirements of sections 23-1-113.7 and 23-1-107, a community college that is part of the state system of community and technical colleges established and governed by this part 2 may, with board approval, offer a bachelor of science degree in nursing as a completion degree to students who have or are pursuing an associate degree in nursing or a practical nursing certificate. In considering whether to approve a request by a community college to offer a bachelor of science in nursing as a completion degree, the board shall consider student and workforce demand, cost effectiveness for the students, and accreditation and licensing requirements. The board shall provide such information to the Colorado commission on higher education and solicit the commission's input in a joint meeting of the board and the commission. A community college that is seeking board approval shall provide the board with data regarding its current partnerships with existing bachelor of science nursing degree programs and its plans to continue such partnerships. At least ninety days prior to requesting board approval to offer a bachelor of science degree in nursing as a completion degree, the community college seeking such board approval shall provide notice to the Colorado commission on higher education and all state public and nonpublic institutions of higher education.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-088), ch. 154, p. 531, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1214), ch. 212, p. 914, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(3) added, (SB 13-178), ch. 241, p. 1170, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(4) added, (SB 14-004), ch. 13, p. 119, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 821, § 18, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(4) amended and (5) added, (HB 18-1086), ch. 70, p. 631, § 3, effective March 24.

L. 2021:

(4) R&RE and (5) amended, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2506, § 9, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(5) amended, (SB 22-003), ch. 71, p. 367, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 241, Session Laws of Colorado 2013. For the legislative declaration in SB 14-004, see section 1 of chapter 13, Session Laws of Colorado 2014. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1086, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-60-212. Northeastern junior college - golf course and restaurant - positions of employment.

Positions of employment for the operation of the golf course and restaurant that are owned and operated by Northeastern junior college and open to the public, known commonly as the "Northeastern 18" and the "Plainsman Grill and Steakhouse", and any successor businesses, are exempt from the state personnel system.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1187), ch. 53, p. 139, § 1, effective March 24.

23-60-213. Red Rocks community college - physician assistant master's program.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Red Rocks community college is authorized to confer a graduate degree upon a student who completes the physician assistant studies program and shall seek accreditation for the program.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added (SB 13-178), ch. 241, p. 1170, § 3, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 241, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.